Hawaii statutes.
[§531B-3] Direction for disposition.
A person may provide written directions for the location, manner, and conditions
of disposition of the person's remains in a testamentary disposition, in a pre-need
contract pursuant to chapter 441, or by any written document signed by the
person and notarized. The written directions may also include arrangements for
funeral goods and services to be provided upon that person's death and shall
take precedence over wishes or other direction by any other person. [L 2013, c
17, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next